lexd_components/verbs_paradigms.lexd
VerbRootNil VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootCilV|VerbRootCilC VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootCanShort VZero Aor PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootComePast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Aor PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootGivePast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootBring VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootTurnPast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootTake VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootOpenPast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootPutPast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootGoPastC VZero ThA Aor PastAgrGoNo3Sg Indc0
VerbRootGoPast3 VZero ThA Aor PastAgrGoYes3Sg Indc0
VerbRootHitPast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootYield VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI Aor PastSecAgr Indc0 # Dir/LR
VerbRootDoPast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootSay VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0 # Dir/LR
VerbRootFallPast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootBite VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootBite VZero PastSplitAgr  Indc0 # Dir/LR
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 # Dir/LR
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0
VerbRootSit VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootSit VZero ThI Aor PastSecAgr  Indc0 # Dir/LR
VerbRootEatPast VZero PastSecAgr Indc0
VerbRootSendPast VZero PastSplitAgr Indc0

PATTERN Imperative
#Optionality is handled via Dir/LR
#Imperatives sg
VerbRootE VZero ThE ImpSg
VerbRootI VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootI VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootA VZero ThA ImpSg 
PassBase Pass ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
PassBase Pass ImpSgIR
CausBase CausPast ImpSgR
InchBase InchEmpty Aor ImpSgIR

VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ImpSgInternalMark #Unclear which one is preferred because archaic/obsolete
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU ImpSgInternalMark
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ImpSgUR
VerbRootUcanel VZero ImpSgUR  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU ImpSgIR
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThE ImpSg
VerbRootNulC VZero ImpSgIR	#Unclear which one is preferred because archaic/obsolete

VerbRootNil VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootCilC VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootCilV VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootCilV VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootCanShort VZero Aor ImpSgIR
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootComePast VZero ImpSgUR
VerbRootCry VZero ThA :ImpSgInternalMark Aor ImpSgInternalMark: # Force the metathesis because aorist boundary causes problems
VerbRootGivePres VZero ImpSgUR
VerbRootBring VZero ImpSgInternalMark 
VerbRootTurnPast VZero ImpSgIR 
VerbRootTake VZero ImpSgInternalMark 
VerbRootOpenPast VZero ImpSgInternalMark 
VerbRootPutImpSg VZero ImpSgIR 
VerbRootGoPast3 VZero ThA ImpSg
VerbRootHitPast VZero ImpSgInternalMark 
VerbRootYield VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootYield VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootAccept VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootDoPast VZero ThE ImpSg
VerbRootSay VZero ThE ImpSg
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero ThE ImpSg
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero ImpSgIR # Dir/LR
VerbRootSpitOldImpSg VZero ImpSgInternalMark # Dir/LR
VerbRootFallPast VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootBite VZero ImpSgInternalMark
VerbRootBite VZero ImpSgIR # Dir/LR
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor ImpSgIR 
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor ImpSgIR
VerbRootStay VZero ThA ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootSit VZero ImpSgIR
VerbRootSit VZero ThI ImpSg # Dir/LR
VerbRootEatPast VZero ImpSgInternalMark
VerbRootSendPast VZero ImpSgInternalMark

#Imperatives pl
VerbRootE VZero ThE Aor ImpPl
VerbRootI VZero ThI Aor ImpPl
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor ImpPl
CausBase CausPast Aor ImpPl
PassBase Pass ThI Aor ImpPl
InchBase InchEmpty Aor ImpPl


VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ImpPl #Unclear which is preferred
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThE Aor ImpPl
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU Aor ImpPl
VerbRootUcanel VZero ImpPl  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU ImpPl
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThE Aor ImpPl

VerbRootNil VZero ImpPl
VerbRootCilV|VerbRootCilC VZero ImpPl
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala VZero ImpPl
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero ImpPl
VerbRootCanShort VZero Aor ImpPl
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootComePast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Aor   ImpPl
VerbRootGivePast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootBring VZero ImpPl 
VerbRootTurnPast VZero ImpPl 
VerbRootTake VZero ImpPl 
VerbRootOpenPast VZero ImpPl 
VerbRootPutPast VZero ImpPl 
VerbRootGoPastC VZero ThA Aor ImpPl
VerbRootHitPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootYield VZero ImpPl
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI Aor ImpPl
VerbRootDoPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootSay VZero ImpPl
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero ImpPl
VerbRootFallPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootBite VZero ImpPl
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor ImpPl
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA Aor ImpPl
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor ImpPl
VerbRootSit VZero ThI Aor ImpPl
VerbRootSit VZero ImpPl # Dir/LR
VerbRootEatPast VZero ImpPl
VerbRootSendPast VZero ImpPl

PATTERN Prohibitive
#Prohibitives
VerbRootE VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootI VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootA VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
CausBase CausPres ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr
PassBase Pass ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr
InchBase InchNasal ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr

VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU [<proh>:] ProhAgr
#VerbRootUcanel group is defective and lacks prohibitives in Boyacioglu

VerbRootNil EmptyNasal VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr
#VerbRootCil EmptyAffr VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr #Need to double this accuracy because Boyacioglu didnt have it
VerbRootNelNale EmptyNasal VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootNelNala EmptyNasal VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootRiseEPres VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootRiseAPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootCilIlc EmptyAffr VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootCilIli VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootCanLong EmptyNasal VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootBeLongPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootComePres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootCry VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootGivePres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootBring VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootTurnPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr
VerbRootTake EmptyNasal VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootOpenPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootPutPres VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootGoPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootHitPres VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootYield VZero [<proh>:] ProhAgrIrEk 
VerbRootAccept VZero [<proh>:] ProhAgrIrEk 
VerbRootDoPres VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootSay VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootSpitOldPres EmptyNasal VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootFallPres VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootBite VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootStay VZero ThA [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootSit VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootEatPres VZero ThE [<proh>:] ProhAgr 
VerbRootSendPres VZero ThI [<proh>:] ProhAgr 

PATTERN SubjectPart
#Subject participle
VerbRootE VZero SubjPart
VerbRootI VZero SubjPart
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor SubjPart
CausBase CausPres SubjPart
PassBase Pass SubjPart
InchBase InchEmpty Aor SubjPart


VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero SubjPart #Unclear which is preferred because obsolete
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU Aor SubjPart 
VerbRootUcanel VZero ThA EmptyNasal SubjPart  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU SubjPart
VerbRootNulC VZero SubjPart  #Unclear which is preferred because obsolete
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart 

VerbRootNil EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart
#VerbRootCil EmptyAffr VZero SubjPart #not listed in boyacioglu
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart
VerbRootRiseEPres|VerbRootRiseAPres VZero SubjPart
VerbRootCilIlc EmptyAffr VZero SubjPart
VerbRootCilIli  VZero SubjPart
VerbRootCanShort Aor VZero SubjPart
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootComePast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Aor SubjPart
VerbRootGivePast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootBring VZero SubjPart
VerbRootTurnPast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootTake EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart
VerbRootOpenPast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootPutPres VZero SubjPart
VerbRootGoPastC VZero ThA Aor SubjPart
VerbRootHitPres VZero SubjPart
VerbRootYield VZero SubjPart
VerbRootAccept VZero SubjPart
VerbRootDoPres VZero SubjPart
VerbRootSay VZero SubjPart
VerbRootSpitOldPres EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart
VerbRootFallPast VZero SubjPart
VerbRootBite EmptyNasal VZero SubjPart
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor SubjPart
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor SubjPart
VerbRootSit VZero SubjPart
VerbRootEatPres VZero SubjPart
VerbRootSendPres VZero SubjPart

PATTERN PerfectPart
#Perfect participle
VerbRootE VZero PerfPart
VerbRootI VZero PerfPart
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor PerfPart
CausBase CausPast Aor PerfPart
PassBase Pass PerfPart
InchBase InchEmpty Aor PerfPart


VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero PerfPart #Unclear which is preferred because obsolete
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU Aor PerfPart 
VerbRootUcanel VZero PerfPart  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU PerfPart
VerbRootNulC VZero PerfPart   

VerbRootNil VZero PerfPart
VerbRootCilV|VerbRootCilC VZero PerfPart
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala VZero PerfPart
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero PerfPart
VerbRootCanShort Aor VZero PerfPart
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootComePast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Aor   PerfPart
VerbRootGivePast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootBring VZero PerfPart
VerbRootTurnPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootTake VZero PerfPart
VerbRootOpenPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootPutPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootGoPastC VZero ThA Aor PerfPart
VerbRootHitPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootYield VZero PerfPart
VerbRootAccept VZero PerfPart
VerbRootDoPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootSay VZero PerfPart
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero PerfPart
VerbRootFallPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootBite VZero PerfPart
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor PerfPart
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor PerfPart
VerbRootSit VZero PerfPart
VerbRootEatPast VZero PerfPart
VerbRootSendPast VZero PerfPart

PATTERN EvidentialPart
#Evidential participle
VerbRootE VZero EvidPart
VerbRootI VZero EvidPart
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor EvidPart
CausBase CausPast Aor EvidPart
PassBase Pass EvidPart
InchBase InchEmpty Aor EvidPart

VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero EvidPart #Unclear which is preferred because obsolete
VerbRootUv|VerbRootUc VZero ThU Aor EvidPart 
VerbRootUcanel VZero EvidPart  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU EvidPart
VerbRootNulC VZero ThU EvidPart   


VerbRootNil VZero EvidPart
#VerbRootCil VZero EvidPart #not listed in boyacioglu
VerbRootNelNale|VerbRootNelNala VZero EvidPart
VerbRootRiseEPast|VerbRootRiseAPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootCilIlc|VerbRootCilIli VZero EvidPart
VerbRootCanShort VZero Aor EvidPart
VerbRootBeLongPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootComePast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Aor EvidPart
VerbRootGivePast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootBring VZero EvidPart
VerbRootTurnPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootTake VZero EvidPart
VerbRootOpenPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootPutPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootGoPastC VZero ThA Aor EvidPart
VerbRootHitPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootYield VZero EvidPart
VerbRootAccept VZero EvidPart
VerbRootDoPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootSay VZero EvidPart
VerbRootSpitOldPres VZero EvidPart
VerbRootFallPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootBite VZero EvidPart
VerbRootPlay VZero Aor EvidPart
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Aor EvidPart
VerbRootSit VZero EvidPart
VerbRootEatPast VZero EvidPart
VerbRootSendPast VZero EvidPart
